public_html/app/tools/lang/data/vec2.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX A erfumar arfumeva/JPR perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumevau/Q perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumeve/J perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumevi/NP perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumevo/J perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumi perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumi/N perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumion/L perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumione perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumionse perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumisen/L perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumisene perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumisense perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumision/L perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumisione perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumisionse perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumisié/P perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumisiéde/P perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumisiége/P perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumison/L perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumisone perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumisonse perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumiven/L perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumivense perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumivion/L perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumivionse perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumivié/P perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumiviéu/Q perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumivon/L perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumivonse perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumié/P perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumiéde/P perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumiége/P perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumiéu/Q perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumo/J perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumon/L perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumone perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumonse perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumà perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumàa/JPR perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumàami/K perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumàau/Q perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumàe/J perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumàelo/S perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumàemi/K perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumài/NP perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumàimo/L perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumàimoni/M perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumàitu/O perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumàndome/G perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumàndomene/G perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumào/J perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumàomi/K perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumàrmene/G perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumàsimo perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumàvami/K perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumàvelo/S perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumàvemi/K perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumàvimo/L perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumàvimoni/M perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumàvitu/O perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumàvomi/K perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumè perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumè/FP perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumème/H perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumèu/Q perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumé/FP perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfuméa/JPR perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfuméami/K perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfuméau/Q perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumée/J perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfuméelo/S perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfuméemi/K perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfuméi/NP perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfuméimo/L perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfuméimoni/M perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfuméitu/O perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumémoni/M perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfuméndome/G perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfuméndomene/G perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfuméo/J perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfuméomi/K perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumésimo perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfuméu/Q perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumévami/K perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumévelo/S perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumévemi/K perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumévimo/L perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumévimoni/M perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumévitu/O perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfumévomi/K perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfúmelo/S perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfúmeme/H perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfúmemi/K perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfúmitu/O perfumar
SFX A erfumar arfúmomi/K perfumar
SFX A ergar argada/I [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argade/I [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argadi/I [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argado/I [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argando/E [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argante [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argar/E [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argaralo/S [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argarami/K [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argaratu/O [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argarave/RT [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argare [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argaremo/L [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argaren/L [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argarense [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argaresi/P [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argaresiu/Q [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argarion/L [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argarionse [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argarisen/L [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argarisense [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argarision/L [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argarisionse [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argarisié/P [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argarisiéu/Q [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argarison/L [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argarisonse [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argarié/P [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argariéu/Q [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argarme/G [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argaron/L [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argaronse [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argarà/JNR [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argaràe/R [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argarè/J [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argarèmi/K [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argaré/P [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argarémoni/M [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argarésimo/L [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argarésimoni/M [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argaréu/Q [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argaría/JNR [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argaríami/K [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argaríatu/O [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argaríe/JR [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argaríelo/S [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argaríemi/K [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argarò/J [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argaròmi/K [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argase/I [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argasi [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argasta/I [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argaste/I [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argasti/I [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argasto/I [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argava/JPR [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argavau/Q [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argave/J [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argavi/NP [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argavo/J [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argede [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argege [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argemo [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argemo/L [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argen/L [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argendo/E [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argene [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argense [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argese/I [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argesi [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argesta/I [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argeste/I [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argesti/I [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argesto/I [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argeva/JPR [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argevau/Q [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argeve/J [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argevi/NP [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argevo/J [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argion/L [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argione [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argionse [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argisen/L [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argisene [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argisense [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argision/L [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argisione [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argisionse [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argisié/P [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argisiéde/P [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argisiége/P [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argison/L [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argisone [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argisonse [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argiven/L [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argivense [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argivion/L [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argivionse [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argivié/P [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argiviéu/Q [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argivon/L [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argivonse [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argié/P [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argiéde/P [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argiége/P [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argiéu/Q [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argon/L [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argone [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argonse [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argà [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argàa/JPR [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argàami/K [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argàau/Q [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argàe/J [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argàelo/S [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argàemi/K [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argài/NP [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argàimo/L [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argàimoni/M [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argàitu/O [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argàndome/G [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argàndomene/G [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argào/J [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argàomi/K [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argàrmene/G [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argàsimo [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argàvami/K [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argàvelo/S [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argàvemi/K [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argàvimo/L [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argàvimoni/M [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argàvitu/O [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argàvomi/K [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argè [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argè/FP [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argème/H [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argèu/Q [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argé/FP [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argéa/JPR [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argéami/K [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argéau/Q [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argée/J [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argéelo/S [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argéemi/K [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argéi/NP [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argéimo/L [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argéimoni/M [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argéitu/O [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argémoni/M [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argéndome/G [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argéndomene/G [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argéo/J [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argéomi/K [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argésimo [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argéu/Q [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argévami/K [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argévelo/S [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argévemi/K [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argévimo/L [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argévimoni/M [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argévitu/O [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar argévomi/K [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar èrga/RF [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar èrge [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar èrge/IJR [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar èrgelo/S [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar èrgeme/H [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar èrgemi/K [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar èrgi [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar èrgi/N [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar èrgitu/O [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar èrgo/J [btv]ergar
SFX A ergar èrgomi/K [btv]ergar
SFX A ergiđar argiđa/RF vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđada/I vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđade/I vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđadi/I vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđado/I vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđando/E vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđante vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđar/E vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđaralo/S vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđarami/K vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđaratu/O vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđarave/RT vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđare vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđaremo/L vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđaren/L vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđarense vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđaresi/P vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđaresiu/Q vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđarion/L vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđarionse vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđarisen/L vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđarisense vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđarision/L vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđarisionse vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđarisié/P vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđarisiéu/Q vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđarison/L vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđarisonse vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđarié/P vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđariéu/Q vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđarme/G vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđaron/L vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđaronse vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđarà/JNR vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđaràe/R vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđarè/J vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđarèmi/K vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđaré/P vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđarémoni/M vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđarésimo/L vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđarésimoni/M vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđaréu/Q vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđaría/JNR vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđaríami/K vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđaríatu/O vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđaríe/JR vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđaríelo/S vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđaríemi/K vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđarò/J vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđaròmi/K vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđase/I vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđasi vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđasta/I vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđaste/I vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđasti/I vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđasto/I vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđava/JPR vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđavau/Q vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđave/J vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđavi/NP vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđavo/J vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđe vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđe/IJR vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđede vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđege vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđemo vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđemo/L vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđen/L vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđendo/E vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđene vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđense vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđese/I vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđesi vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđesta/I vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđeste/I vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđesti/I vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđesto/I vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđeva/JPR vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđevau/Q vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđeve/J vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđevi/NP vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđevo/J vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđi vergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđi/N vergiđar
